Utah statutes.
67-11-6.   Establishment of Contribution Fund -- Powers, authority, and
jurisdiction of state agency -- Withdrawals from fund -- Payments into United
States Treasury.
(1)  There is hereby established a special fund to be known as the
Contribution Fund.  Such fund shall consist of and there shall be deposited in
such fund:
(a)  all contributions, interests, and penalties collected under Sections
67-11-4 and 67-11-5;
(b)  all moneys appropriated thereto under this chapter;
(c)  any property or securities and earnings thereof acquired through the use
of moneys belonging to the fund;
(d)  interest earned upon any moneys in the fund; and
(e)  all sums recovered upon the bond of the custodian or otherwise for losses
sustained by the fund and all other moneys received from the fund from any
other source.
(2)  All moneys in the fund shall be mingled and undivided.  Subject to the
provisions of this chapter, the state agency is vested with full power,
authority, and jurisdiction over the fund, including all moneys and property
or securities belonging to it, and may perform any and all acts whether or not
specifically designated, which are necessary to the administration of the fund
and are consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(3)  The Contribution Fund shall be established and held separate and apart
from any other funds or moneys of the state and shall be used and administered
exclusively for the purpose of this chapter.  Withdrawals from such fund shall
be made for, and solely for:
(a)  payment of amounts required to be paid to the secretary of the treasury
of the United States pursuant to an agreement entered into under Section
67-11-3;
(b)  payment of refunds provided for in Subsection 67-11-4(3); and
(c)  refunds for overpayments, not otherwise adjustable, made by a political
subdivision or instrumentality.
(4)  The custodian of the Contribution Fund shall pay to the secretary of the
treasury of the United States from the Contribution Fund such amounts and at
such time or times as may be directed by the state agency in accordance with
any agreement entered into under Section 67-11-3 and the Social Security Act.
(5)  The treasurer of the state shall be ex officio treasurer and custodian of
the Contribution Fund and shall administer the fund in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and the directions of the state agency and shall
pay all warrants drawn upon it in accordance with the provisions of this
section and with such rules as the state agency may prescribe pursuant
thereto.
(6)  In addition to the contributions collected and paid into the Contribution
Fund under Sections 67-11-4 and 67-11-5, there shall be paid into the
Contribution Fund such sums as are found to be necessary in order to make the
payments to the secretary of the treasury which the state is obligated to make
pursuant to an agreement entered into under Section 67-11-3.  The amount which
is necessary to make the portion of such additional payment to the secretary
of the treasury which is attributable to the coverage of the employees of each
department, commission, council, branch, agency, or other division or
organization of the state which employs persons covered by the Social Security
Act pursuant to an agreement entered into under Section 67-11-3 shall be paid
from the funds which have been appropriated, authorized, or allocated to such
department.
